California, session 20252026, SB747.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 53.8 is added to the Civil Code, to read:53.8. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the No Kings Act.(b) Every natural person who, under color of any law, statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage, subjects, or causes to be subjected, any citizen of this state or any person within the jurisdiction thereof to the deprivation of any rights, privileges, or immunities secured by the United States Constitution, shall be liable to the party injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for redress, except that in any action brought against a judicial officer for an act or omission taken in the officer’s judicial capacity, injunctive relief shall not be granted unless a declaratory decree was violated or declaratory relief was unavailable.(c) An action brought pursuant to subdivision (b) may be filed either in the superior court for the county in which the conduct complained of occurred or in the superior court for the county in which a natural person whose conduct complained of resides or has their place of business.(d) A defendant in an action brought under subdivision (b) may assert a defense of absolute or qualified immunity to the same extent as a person sued under Section 1983 of Title 42 of the United States Code under like circumstances. This subdivision applies only to proceedings brought under subdivision (b), and does not alter, amend, create, or support a qualified or absolute immunity defense in any other action or proceeding brought under any other provision of California law.(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive or abrogate any defense of sovereign immunity otherwise available to a party. This subdivision applies only to proceedings brought under subdivision (b), and does not alter, amend, create, or support a sovereign immunity defense in any other action or proceeding brought under any other provision of California law.(f) In any action or proceeding brought under this section, the court, in its discretion, may award a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, except that in any action brought against a judicial officer for an act or omission taken in the officer’s judicial capacity, the officer shall not be held liable for any fees or costs, except if the officer’s action was clearly in excess of the officer’s jurisdiction. In any action or proceeding brought under this section, the court, in its discretion, may award expert fees to the prevailing plaintiff.(g) A civil action brought under subdivision (b) shall not be commenced later than two years after the date that the cause of action accrues.(h) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.(i) This section shall apply retroactively to March 1, 2025, provided that, for any claim for a violation of the United States Constitution that occurred between March 1, 2025, and the effective date of this section, the only monetary damages that shall be available pursuant to this section for that constitutional violation are nominal and compensatory damages.(j) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Color of any law, statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage” includes color of any statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage, of the United States and of any state or territory or the District of Columbia.(2)    “Natural person” does not include a federal, state, or local official who is sued in their official capacity for monetary relief.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to provide sufficient redress for the infringement of the civil liberties of all persons in the state as soon as possible, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.